{
    "arts": [
        "How to Have a Conversation With Well-Meaning People We all have our family of origin, and then we have our family of friends. It's one of the great perks of adulthood -- you get to pick a second family of friends who love you.",
        "The Arts Are Chocolate for the Brain Crossword puzzles, word scrambles and other \"brain games\" are popular choices for people trying to preserve their memory. Yet, recent research shows these activities are not challenging enough.",
        "Not Getting Married Today It was difficult to explain to this passionate Cuban man that I didn't want to marry anybody. Still don't. Why not? I'm one of those men that Professor Henry Higgins described as \"a confirmed old bachelor, and likely to remain so.\"",
        "8 Fairs to Visit During Armory Week Whether you're a film aficionado, a young collector, a fan of emerging art or merely interested in getting a finger on the pulse of what's going on in the art world at the present moment, there's plenty to do.",
        "Reality and Imagination: Photo Collage on Coney Island For this ongoing project titled \"Reality and Imagination,\" photographer Leslie Jean-Bart spends hours at Coney Island, studying the sea, the sand, the boardwalk, the people, their interactions.",
        "A Day in the Life of a Modern Poet This morning, we are under-slept and under-caffeinated, but the usual weekend lolling doesn't apply when you're trying to cobble together a living through your creative work.",
        "Dennis Hare: 'Without Restraint,' at the Bakersfield Museum of Art I recently interviewed Dennis Hare, and asked him about his background, artistic development and influences.",
        "How to Make Broadway Musical Theater More Diverse... and Empower Kids Along the Way If musical theater will ever be racially, ethnically, and socioeconomically diverse, this is how it's going to happen, enabled by the organizational machinery, the adaptable repertoire, and the money of the rich corporations that own Broadway.",
        "'No Exit,' Long Beach Playhouse Studio Theatre, Long Beach, CA It takes place in a small room. No windows, no mirrors, no way out. Uptown Estelle (Genevieve Simon) is attracted to Garcin (Anthony B. Cohen). Inez (Natalie Beisner) is attracted to Estelle.",
        "First Nighter: A Strong Review for \"Posterity,\" Des Bishop Is \"Made in China\" Doug Wright loves to wrangle with deceased figures of greater or lesser fame, and in Posterity, at the Atlantic's Linda Gross Theatre, he comes up with a humdinger.",
        "An Eggplant With A Yolk? These Fruits And Veggies Are Not What They Seem! What you see is definitely not an orange.",
        "The Greatest Holocaust Story Never Told Have you ever heard of these women? I'm sure you could rattle off each Kardashian, or the name of Mila Kunis's new baby. Here is why these are the names that should be on your lips this week.",
        "Stage Door: 'One Hand Clapping, Clinton the Musical' Janet's tale, about a young married British couple in Northern England in 1961, is a strangely compelling look at the state of consumerism and love gone goofy. Equal parts social commentary and theater of the absurd, One Hand Clapping, at 59E59 Theaters, is a thoughtful and engaging dark comedy.",
        "Mutoid Waste Guide the Lost Tea Party to Burning Man The first experience of a Mutoid Waste installation may  trigger a load of reactions. Often it starts with the inevitable \"wow\" of disbelief. After a few seconds, when reality has somehow kicked back in, this disbelief morphs into pure joy and then a sense of playfulness.",
        "David Allan Peters at Ameringer | McEnery | Yohe David Allan Peters, has been building heavily layered paintings that he carves into to reveal rich stratigraphies of color. Kaleidoscopic in their intensity, Peters' works are both intuitive excavations and explorations of pattern.",
        "Death and the Dysfunctional American Family Two recent productions by small theatre companies in Berkeley focused on fictional American families with more than enough misery to go around.",
        "Scott Elliott and the Theater of the Uncomfortable I've come to admire people, and theater companies, that take the risk. You have to hand it to Elliott -- more than any other major off-Broadway theater company, The New Group consistently produces offbeat works.",
        "Once More, Back On The Town Playgoers who haven't walked away from a Broadway musical beaming since before they can remember should head over to Times Square for On The Town, the 1944 musical which introduced Leonard Bernstein, Betty Comden, Adolph Green and Jerome Robbins.",
        "Boys in the Attic Two recent Bay Area productions included characters whose lives were haunted by the suicide of their son. The ghost of one son appears onstage; the other is never seen.",
        "Theater: Glorious \"Spring,\" Sugar \"Daddy,\" Stingy Stein Spring Awakening left Broadway just six years ago. And its original cast -- Jonathan Groff, John Gallagher Jr. and Lea Michele -- left huge shoes to fill. But it's a delight to see the story has lost none of its impact, the score and songs none of their dusky, moody impact.",
        "Now and Then I have to believe that if I had the access to social networking and the Internet that exists today, I would have experienced less isolation.",
        "M\u00c3\u00a9lissa Laveaux at The Global Beat Festival - Serving Smiles and Warmth The rain in the beginning of New York's summer season occurs often and prodigiously. It doesn't however, impede the progress or plans of the average Gotham pedestrian.",
        "Linking Art, Culture, Commerce and Through Technology, the World We know that technology is shrinking the globe, but the reasons are largely economic: mostly the opportunity to see the world as one market, with standardized goods and services, standardized marketing and standardized messaging.",
        "This Venice Biennale Is Dedicated to an Artist Who Evokes the Eroticism That Lies Underneath Self-Destruction His conceptualism achieves somethings apparently impossible which is to be experienced at an emotional level. The way, however, his work has been read till now, insists on transforming his pieces into a visual representation of some aspects of continental social philosophy.",
        "LA Phil's Long Journey with Pell\u00c3\u00a9as et M\u00c3\u00a9lisande a Glowing Success The performance succeeded at every level, revealing in its unusual format an equally valid way to present Pell\u00c3\u00a9as et M\u00c3\u00a9lisande. It will stand as one of the greatest ever in Disney Hall and a milestone in the history of this unique work of musical art.",
        "Fab Phils Pumped for European Tour Sergei Rachmaninoff 's Symphony no. 3, composed in the mid-30s, was also a commission by the Philadelphia Orchestra. It has a surface of the composer's signature romanticism, but he blasts through that shape shifting to something more aggressive.",
        "Czech's Mix Part 3:  Clarinet Factory (VIDEO) One of the surprising performances at the Crossroads Festival (part of the Colours of Ostrava Festival) in Czech Republic, was from the ensemble called the Clarinet Factory. Made up of heavily classically credentialed players, they made music that was seductive to the ear.",
        "Explosive Illusions The sun was up. A weekday. Seemed the perfect moment to cycle over to see the new blockbuster exhibit of Diego Velasquez, the 17th century Spanish master whose works are scarcely known in France.",
        "Trisha Williams and Gamer Girl Pinups: Fine Art and Women in the Gaming World In a very particular world, dominated by a very particular breed of men, Trisha Williams decided to step to the forefront and give this dangerous milieu exactly what it needs. This, ladies and gentlemen, is the world of video games.",
        "Libraries Are Paving The Way For Cultural Unity The lack of diverse children's books published annually does not reflect the rich cultural tapestry that surrounds us.",
        "'Fiddler on the Roof' -- Long Beach Playhouse Mainstage Theatre Old habits die hard. Especially when the habits are religious traditions and the agents of change seek to persecute those traditions. \"Fiddler on the Roof,\" written by Joseph Stein, music by Jerry Bock, lyrics by Sheldon Harnick, directed by Phyllis B. Gitlin for the Long Beach Playhouse Mainstage Theatre, is a moving and painful account of the conflict.",
        "Mapping the World as She Imagines It: Xuchi Naungayan Eggleton For this non-traditional, mixed use space -- delightfully situated at the heart of a busy Oakland mall -- Naungayan Eggleton has flattened her work and moved away from her customary monochromatic palette, producing vertical panels whose saturated colors and sheens leap off the walls.",
        "Permission Denied Like Hand to God, Permission is outrageous and profane; like its predecessor, it can be seen as a sledgehammer attack on religion featuring violence and sex, albeit without as much bloodshed. But there the similarities end. Hand to God is inspired; Permission, alas, is not.",
        "Outbursts of Genius in San Francisco Ballet's Romeo and Juliet Helgi Tomasson's Romeo and Juliet made a comeback at San Francisco's War Memorial Opera House last night, buoyed by a vivid and sensitive performance of the Prokofiev score by the San Francisco Ballet Orchestra, under the electrifying baton of Martin West.",
        "Art That: A) Amuses, B) Challenges, C) Leaves Us in Disbelief There's a huge difference between looking at art, and actually seeing it. When I make this statement during the lectures and seminars, people usually ask, \"What the hell is the difference?\" So let me tell you my friends: there is a huge difference.",
        "My Daughter Took Me to Burning Man My husband and I were going to Burning Man for the first time -- under the tutelage of our 26-year old daughter, Zai, her partner, Phil, and a large group of their friends.",
        "First Nighter: James McAvoy Rules 'The Ruling Class,' A Feminized Treasure Island,' 'Di and Viv and Rose' on Friendship When Peter Barnes decided the ruling English class was nutty, he created Jack Gurney and wrote The Ruling Class, a hellzapoppin satire during most of which Gurney (James McAvoy) contends he's Jesus.",
        "The Mesmerizing Photographs of Eva Schlegel Arrive at Park Hyatt Vienna Eva Schlegel is best known for her photographic portraits that focus in front or behind her subjects, but never on the subjects themselves. These create blurry images that are distinctly human, but devoid of self.",
        "My Tomas Vu Interview In 2011, Vu made his first laser-engraved wooden surfboard, setting out to make 210, one for each of the Beatles' songs.",
        "Night and Her Stars, the Garage Theatre in Collision With Alive Theatre, Long Beach, CA The show ends, sweetly if not a little sadly, with the two of them outside, not in front of a miniature, black and white screen. The father teaches the son the names of the trees on his property.",
        "Into the Woods at the Wallis Annenberg Center The Oregon Shakespeare Festival's revival of Stephen Sondheim's iconic musical, now playing at the Wallis Annenberg Center in Beverly Hills, is an uneven, if often delightful, rendition of Sondheim's parable of the trials and tribulations of childhood and growing up.",
        "Aisle View: Kiss of the Vampire The comedic chameleon Arnie Burton first came to view in the 2008 parody version of Alfred Hitchcock's The 39 Steps, a four-character romp in which he was one of two men who played all the roles other than the hero and heroine.",
        "Naked Will You don't have to adhere to predestination to accept the notion that subliminal forces, for good or bad, may play a more important role in the unfolding of your fate than naked will.",
        "The Importance of Being Collaborative The established model of presenting new works to audiences is changing and the audiences are changing dramatically too. An entire generation of composers and performers are taking the presentation of their works into their own hands.",
        "Spring Studio Is Dead, Long Live Spring Studio Some years ago, I lived in one of those artsy little towns which freckle the South. There was a main road in this town, and off to one side of it, a fenced-off bare lot. Walking past, one would notice slow changes in the lot: the digging of a foundation, laying in of beams, the start of a building.",
        "The Composers Speak: Broadway Composers Participate in a Concert of Their Choral Work These writers have made their names in musical theater, but they value the opportunity to compose and be recognized for their choral music.",
        "Tanya Habjouqa's 'Occupied Pleasures': Keeping Our Humanity I first discovered photographer Tanya Habjouqa in Florence, where her photo exhibit was showcased during the Middle East Now Film Festival.",
        "First Nighter: Chenoweth, Gallagher at Full Steam in Three-Quarters Steam On the Twentieth Century' During the On the Twentieth Century revival -- a musical comedy vehicle about a vehicle -- any number of Broadway veterans, including Kristin Chenoweth and Peter Gallagher, are working at the top of their forms.  On the job and giving their all throughout, they're offering patrons plenty of cause to be entertained.",
        "Painted Words: The Marriage of Words and Images There are paintings made from words, and words made from paint. Words, in painted form, find themselves layered, blended and brushed towards poetry.",
        "New Music Review: Klassik, Spring From the first few rhythmic beats of the opening track, \"Go Far,\" I was hooked. Soulful sound? Check. Appealing, familiar tonality? Check. Thought-provoking and inspiring lyrics? Check.",
        "Anne-Sophie Mutter - A Profile of the Artist \"First of all, at every concert, I always think -- this could be my last. Therefore, I will give it everything I have.\"",
        "A New 'Merry Widow' With Renee Fleming In Widow's Weeds It is hard to imagine a merrier widow than Renee Fleming, and she swirls through the Metropolitan Opera's sumptuous new production of Franz Lehar's popular operetta The Merry Widow with the ease of a woman who knows what she wants and knows how to get it.",
        "Stella Abrera: Ballerina on a Double Mission Ballet history is usually made in the august opera houses of St. Petersburg, Moscow, London, Paris and New York. But these days historic moments in ballet are taking place elsewhere as Misty Copeland made her debut in Swan Lake.",
        "A Brief Rant on the Exhaustion of the Avant-Garde, Zombie Formalism and What Contemporary Painting Needs to Move Forward There is a deep need for art that is authentic, engaged with the world and more about skill and knowledge than ego. Representation, which has been so restricted for the past decade, has vast untapped potential, and can be \"progressive\" in countless unexpected ways.",
        "Art & the Tyranny of the New I think it's time to create a market for art that deepens the spirit, not makes it shallower, a market to encourage art that taps into wisdom and truth that has lasted for generations, eons, as long as memory has served humanity.",
        "For the Love of Theater A few weeks ago, I wasn't feeling so great. My allergies were bothering me and I was tired, as I often am this time of year. Then I went to the theater. Miraculously I felt better during Act One.",
        "Je Suis Charlie Today the world that cherishes free speech and secularism is reeling from the devastating violent loss of life and the real dangers posed to speech. However scary it may be, I want to declare: Write. Draw. Say the outrageous.",
        "I On Exceptional Living -- Nikki Haskell: A Timeless Icon Her skirts are short; her boyfriends are young; her fingernails are long; and her energy is endless. Nikki is always overdressed and ready to go. Her motto is \"Never give in. Never give up. And never take 'no' for an answer.\" If Nikki can't do it in high heels; she's not interested",
        "Stage Door: Ute Lemper Sings Love Songs of Pablo Neruda It may sound an unusual topic for cabaret, but the actress, who devised the concept, melodies and vocal compositions, scores another musical triumph. Her jazzy rendition of Neruda's love poems is hypnotic, delivered in Spanish, French and English.",
        "First Nighter: New Dance Craze \"Flexn\" Fills Park Avenue Armory Would the 21 dancers of Flexn, directed by Reggie (Regg Roc) Gray and Peter Sellars, object to their movement styles being described as break-dancing hiked to another level?",
        "Calling All Minds: Table Talk With Benjamin Moe Benjamin Moe, 21-year-old co-founder and editor-in-chief of Table Talk, sneaks about the dimly lit corridors of a coal factory in rural Jaipur, tacking CALL FOR SUBMISSIONS to the factory's rusty insides.",
        "Part and Parcel: Danielle Krysa Krysa is an accomplished selector of detail, in both her own artwork and her efforts to champion other artists. Her joy in making and sharing art is evident in Collage -- the pieces in this book are playful, inventive, and utterly inspiring.",
        "Attention: Sports Fans! Any form of corruption can taint a sport whose integrity is held sacrosanct in the eyes of its biggest fans. Two recent Bay area productions helped to shine a light on how difficult it can be to win simply on the basis of one's merit.",
        "Comedy, Tonight! A popular show business axiom insists that \"Dying is easy, comedy is hard.\" While any performer who has bombed onstage will quickly acknowledge this bitter truth, the bottom line is that comedy depends on good ideas and solid execution.",
        "The Archivist's Dilemma: Q&A With Oddball Films' Stephen Parr While working on my new film in the Bay Area this summer, I had the good fortune of being introduced to Stephen Parr and his massive 6000 sq. ft. archive aptly named Oddball Films.",
        "The Art of Falling: Hubbard Street Dance and Second City's Comic Liaisons Early on in the ingenious collaboration between Second City and Hubbard Street Dance, Procol Harum's counterculture hymn permeates Chicago's Harris Theater as actors and dancers assemble in rows of folding chairs facing the audience.",
        "Attention Must Be Paid The San Francisco Opera recently revived John Copley's 1987 production of Verdi's masterpiece (commissioned by Terry McEwen) as part of its 2014 summer season. Not having seen this particular production since it came online nearly 25 years ago, I had looked forward to getting reacquainted with its charms.",
        "A City at the Edge of the Horizon: The 2014 Kochi-Muziris Biennale The ancient port city of Muziris, perched at the mouth of the Periyar River near the tip of the Indian subcontinent, offered harbor to merchant fleets of Greece, Rome, Phoenicia, and Egypt in the earliest centuries of global maritime trade.",
        "\"Cartographia: Artifacts of a Creative Journey,\" Torrance Art Museum This exhibition proposes that artists are mapmakers, their works, maps, and their audience, orienteers. It also suggests a correlation between its content and form. If maps and mapping strategies are the content, then a virtual exhibition is its form.",
        "The Rocky Road to Self-Awareness Getting to know yourself better, deeper, and more intimately has fallen under all kinds of labels from meditation to masturbation, from navel gazing to spiritual grazing. The truth is, some people embrace self-examination while others are forced to confront themselves in a mirror.",
        "Recordings From Music Maker Relief Foundation (and a Free Album!) Public folklorists like me often advocate for traditional arts, and for individual traditional artists. We try to increase funding, support, and participation in the art forms we work with, and we recommend artists for gigs, awards, grants, and other recognition.",
        "Valley Vista The Valley was its own hotbed of creative activity back in the day when Los Angeles was still on the cusp of recognition as an important center for contemporary art.",
        "The (Tortured) Soul of Wit I like to imagine that the collected works of @NeinQuarterly will make their way into a dissertation one day, perhaps written by an earnest graduate student interested in U.S.-German cultural relations as mediated by the internet in the 2010s.",
        "Time Release After opens like a horror story. An ominous undertow pervades its early frames, giving us the feeling we are watching a scary movie that will tighten its screws and escalate our dread until something too terrifying to endure occurs.",
        "Stage Door: Dry Powder, The Star Keeper \"Vacations are for amateurs,\" sneers Jenny, a cofounder of a private-equity firm. She's ambitious, smart and driven by excessive profits -- by any means necessary.",
        "Bits and Snatches Most of us, upon hearing the term amuse-bouche, instantly think of food. But in some situations I often think of programs which offer a collection of short plays as a long string of amuse-bouches. Some are tastier and have more heft than others; some have an almost ethereal appeal.",
        "11 Odd Household Objects That Will Intrigue You, Then Frustrate You Beyond Belief For as much discomfort her cruel designs give us, they do make us appreciate good design one hell of a lot more.",
        "GHOST the Musical The magic of GHOST, both the film and musical production, is the chilling sensation you get watching the hero fight for the woman he loves from beyond the grave.  It keeps you on the edge of your seat.",
        "Ojai Turns on the Water Works Direct, immediate, nuanced, and responsive to the artist's hand, water-based mediums defy attempts at revision, demanding that the artist work quickly and intuitively, and be acutely present in the moment.",
        "An AIDS Quilt Songbook: Sing for Hope I'm happy projects like this take a step toward educating people, and take many steps toward supporting AIDS/HIV services and research organizations through sales proceeds.",
        "Sandy Frank: An Appreciation Sanford Jay Frank, the Emmy Award-winning writer and producer, screenwriting guru and conservative ideologue whom everyone called Sandy, died at his home in Calabasas on April 18.",
        "Atlantic for Kids Brings Lisa Loeb's Musical and More to NYC As arts education continues to get cut across the country, someone needs to pick up the slack. There need to be more affordable shows that parents can take children to see.  So I am happy that Atlantic for Kids exists.",
        "23 Valentine's Day Cards That Are Actually Works Of Art They won't throw these cards away.",
        "10 Things About Having an Opera Career That You Don't Learn in School As someone who has been working in this industry for the past 15 years, I wanted to share with all of you some of the tidbits I wished someone had told me when I was starting out. Brace yourselves - it's not all pretty.",
        "NYC Photographer Leverages Instagram to Plot the Future of Marketing In the past two years Instagram has shot to mainstream popularity. For those who may have just recently jumped on the bandwagon, you may not know that Instagrams' early adopters were photographers.",
        "Anna Deavere Smith on the 44th Jefferson Lecture and the Search for American Character Humanities, the arts, words, culture, character, the language that people really speak when they speak to each other -- oh, these are creatively deep waters for somebody like Anna Deavere Smith to swim through.",
        "After Postmodernism: Michael Pearce Writes About 'Art in the Age of Emergence' Emergence, a cross-disciplinary theory which deals with the way that higher-order complexity can arise out of chaos, presents a powerful new model for aesthetics. For Pearce, emergence opened a dynamic alternative to what he feels have been the reductive and culturally erosive tendencies of Postmodernism in art.",
        "The Summer of Doug Aitken Arrives in Europe Creating what his gallery term \"fine art installations,\" and roaming across a wide range of media, techniques and subjects, Aitken's work has been difficult to categorize. But taken together, these three shows should give the unacquainted viewer a full overview of who he is.",
        "Art Galleries Get Wise During the Busiest Time of the Year Art patrons scramble trying to figure out which exhibition will have the best opening and art party. Yes, there are a few galleries that choose a later date to celebrate the opening of the next exhibition, but most have not strayed from this ritual.",
        "100 Walkers\" Subverts in West Hollwood on April 18 It's disingenuous that nobody walks in LA--we have a become a stroller's paradise, with art walks abounding in every neighborhood.",
        "Utah Shakespeare Festival Offers Unique Experience The Utah Shakespeare Festival is truly unique. Founded in 1961 and presenting its first season in 1962, the organizers wanted to create something special. And they have.",
        "The Titli Interviews: Filmmaker Kanu Behl in Cannes For me, there is always a film within a festival that defies all expectations. Of course, to even choose a film from a catalogue of hundreds, it has to be on my radar for a few reasons (some truly mundane) which include favorite actor or actress, filmmaker, writer or producer.",
        "Francesca Zambello Extends Contract With Washington National Opera Through September 2018 Today, Washington National Opera (WNO) announced that Francesca Zambello will extend her term as Artistic Director for three years, through September 2018. She has served as the company's Artistic Director since January 2013 and as its Artistic Advisor since June 2011.",
        "Bellydancing Gave Her Confidence and a Pain-Free Body Mention bellydancing to most Americans and they'll envision sultry slave girls in a James Bond movie or sex workers in a tawdry lap dance club.",
        "Ed Moses: The Lion of Venice Reflects on Maintaining the Fire Ed Moses, the grand lion of Venice, California, sits in a black chair in his studio gallery slowly rotating, watching as studio assistants move his huge paintings on geometric canvases.",
        "I Contain Multitudes: Brian Martinez Their team didn't make the finals, or even the semifinals, but there was something about his performance, his intenseness, his citing Emily Dickinson with grit. The clip was so short, just a few words; no one would even know that he was performing Emily Dickinson...but I would know.",
        "Art, War, Gold It's been exactly nine years since the glorious day when Michael Govan, the newly appointed Director of Los Angeles County Museum of Art, greeted a larger than usual crowd at a press opening in March of 2006.",
        "New Wave Women: Pulse and Nada \"By photographing these marginal details; stains, traces, dust, dirt, I bring them to the center of vision, allowing them to exist and prevail,\" she says, in an attempt to foreground \"the abjectness of the otherwise invisible.\"",
        "Exclusive Interview With Photographer and Documentary Filmmaker Nora De Angelli Nora de Angelli is a London-based freelance photographer and documentary filmmaker. Until 2011, when she graduated from London College of Communication's University of Arts, with an M.A. in Documentary Film under her belt, De Angelli was an accomplished research scientist.",
        "The Hollywood Blacklist in Exile Stories of the Hollywood blacklist of the 1940s and '50s are, by now, well known. Many books, articles and documentaries exist about the lives of actors who the studios deemed unemployable because of their association with the Communist Party."
    ],
    "business": [
        "How to Future Proof Your Workplace Technology has enabled us to work anywhere and the locations of work have extended beyond the office building, into a variety of public spaces, fundamentally altering how space is used over time, by blurring the boundaries between corporate, retail, hospitality and residential uses.",
        "Leaders: Legal, Ethical or Right? When people decide to disregard their moral compass as the official business handbook, they begin to make up the rules as they go. Anything can happen, and the situation frequently proves to be a source of conflict.",
        "Stores Open On Christmas Eve Include Walmart, Best Buy, Target, Among Others Did you leave your Christmas shopping for the very last minute? Not to worry. America's retailers have got you covered. Here",
        "My Biggest Leadership Win: The Day My Life Stopped Working To truly lead in the world and create the results you want in all areas of your life, it will require you to create conscious shifts and become the leader of your future.",
        "3 Reasons Obama's Oil Tax Would Be Good For America It would push gas prices up, but the planet will thank us.",
        "Startups Like to Tango The government is working on multiple fronts to build a better future by empowering their citizens to succeed in the new economy: educating for the 21st century, promoting entrepreneurship and the creative economy and innovating for inclusion.",
        "Uber Just Surrendered To Its Biggest Rival In China It's a $35 billion megamerger.",
        "Major Banks Aid In Payday Loans Banned By States - NYTimes.com Major banks have quickly become behind-the-scenes allies of Internet-based payday lenders that offer short-term loans with",
        "Are Your Strengths Undermining Your Success? It sounds counter-intuitive but new research suggests while many workplaces have started to advocate the use of your strengths, there is a real potential for what you do best to become a career-limiting weakness.",
        "I Stopped Working For A Half-Hour Every Day And Got More Done Turns out, going outside can do wonders.",
        "Uber Has Picked A New CEO. Here's What He Needs To Do Out Of The Gate. Dara Khosrowshahi faces a long to-do list.",
        "Marriott, Starwood Hotels Merger Approved Marriott's acquisition will create the biggest hotel company in the world.",
        "Glenn Hubbard: 'Naive' To Think Fed Stimulus Can Solve Jobs Crisis \u00e2\u0080\u009cI would be much more comfortable if, in fact, Congress would take some of this burden from us and address those issues,\" Bernanke",
        "Founder Leadership Models If you can navigate a leadership model that keeps the founder involved and engaged in the business as it scales, it meaningfully improves your odds that startup magic will happen.",
        "Women in Business Q&A:  Kathrin Lausch, Executive Producer, Ntropic Kathrin Lausch serves as Executive Producer of visual studio Ntropic in the New York office.  Kathrin was born and raised in Europe, where she later studied marketing, advertising, and entertainment law and earned degrees from both the University of Munich and the University of Geneva.",
        "Markets Close High Following Strong Economic Data NEW YORK, Aug 27 (Reuters) - Wall Street rallied in a volatile session on Thursday, fueled by optimism after strong U.S. economic",
        "Three Reasons Why Non-Foreclosed People Should Care About The Foreclosure Crisis The best hope, then, is to prevent future crises. Which is reason to pay close attention to whether the financial sector",
        "How We Built an Office That Works for Employees and Guests When visitors come into our new office in Midtown Manhattan, one of the first questions we often get is, \"Can I have my own desk here?\"",
        "Highly Contagious Virus Behind Boston Chipotle Outbreak Chipotle\u00e2\u0080\u0099s going viral for all the wrong reasons -- again.",
        "Victory for Americans: Walgreen's Won't 'Invert' to Avoid U.S. Taxes. As conservatives have been telling us since the wave of inversions began, we can't expect corporations to be \"moral\" or \"patriotic.\" If we write the rules that let them get away with immoral and unpatriotic betrayal of U.S. taxpayers, they will do it.  So the next order of business is to get Congress to pass legislation.",
        "Snap Shares Tumble As Short Sellers Move In It's ugly.",
        "Some Benevolent Green Billionaire Should Buy The Whole U.S. Coal Industry Right Now The industry's value has dropped two-thirds in just five years.",
        "Design for Startup Companies What impact does great design have on a startups' success, and how can they best apply design when on a shoestring budget? It is a mistake to think that plowing design resources into a visual identity, as usual, will do the job.",
        "Hard Times and Harder Choices Both Piketty and Clark say that politics, not economics, will determine the future. However, the economy will certainly be a major focus of upcoming election debates in both countries. The real question is, will the electorates in the U.S. and the UK stage a revolt?",
        "Big Banks Won\u00e2\u0080\u0099t Say If They Use The Same Scheme That Led To Wells Fargo\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Fraud Lofty sales incentives drove that bank's workers to majorly rip off consumers.",
        "Leadership and Transparency 2015: The Social Media Imperative By the time \"trends\" get mentioned in new year forecast blog posts, they can be a little more \"old\" than \"news.\" Though forward motion is always worth celebrating, change usually happens more slowly.",
        "How Mortgage Servicing Has Come to Resemble Professional Wrestling (But Not As Much Fun) As a long-time fan of professional wrestling I've come to see how much of mortgage servicing resembles what goes on in the ring.  Like wrestling the servicing business is full of \"works,\" \"gimmicks,\" \"heels and baby faces,\" so let me explain.",
        "How to Pick a Lifestyle Consistent with Your Passion Too many people, young and older, let their career and their lifestyle happen to them, rather than proactively making things happen based on their personal passions, skills, and interests.",
        "Please Take Me Off Your List, Petco Try as hard as she might, Michelle Blanchard can't get off Petco's email list. What will it take to get the company to stop",
        "10 Companies Profiting Most From War: 24/7 Wall St. In addition, the U.S.\u00e2\u0080\u0099s involvement in conflicts in Iraq and Afghanistan have wound down significantly. The last American",
        "Netflix Hits Like 'Stranger Things' Are Pulling In New Subscribers The streaming giant's third-quarter earnings were nothing like the Upside Down.",
        "Bank Of America Appears To Flip On Firearm Promise With Loan To Remington The bank pledged in April to stop financing companies that sell military-style firearms to civilians. Remington made the Bushmaster rifle used in the Sandy Hook school massacre.",
        "Fiscal Cliff Could Put Cash-Strapped Cities At Risk 'GAME OF CHICKEN' \"The thought that they would allow the economic harm that would ensue if we went over the fiscal cliff",
        "Economists: Mild Winter May Have Made Recent Jobs Reports Look Better Than They Were As most Americans basked in the warmest, sunniest March in half a century, economists stared at the skies with dread: Could",
        "Big Banks Raise Rates As Investors Bet They'll Benefit From Fed's Move Banks appear to be among the biggest beneficiaries of the Federal Reserve's decision to increase the cost to borrow.",
        "How to Find the ROI in Social In the world of coordinated creation of social media stories, there's typically two kinds of success, or ROI, on social campaigns -- Cost Mitigation and Sales Increase.",
        "Disconnect From Your Smartphone and Rest Your Mind As the New Year ushers in a time for us to reflect on our past, it also allows us to think about ways to refresh our minds with new, creative ideas.",
        "The Economic Recovery Is Super-Sizing Houses Square footage is growing faster now than it did during the housing boom, but the culture of the McMansion may be changing.",
        "What Do Goldman Sachs and the St. Louis Cardinals Have in Common With Your Business? It's too late for Goldman Sachs and the Cardinals get ahead of their brand and reputation issues but it's not too late to your organization to take control of your brand and reputation by crossing the bridge to strategic integration.",
        "The New Norm: Crazy Contracts and How to Fight Back Businesses -- large and small -- are producing insanely one-sided contracts. In the past, you could find fair contracts. Most were short and simple, too. You do this and I do that. But now we've arrived at crazy. And these agreements are putting your business in jeopardy.",
        "So You're Hiring a Consultant? -- A Few Do's and Dont's After close to 30 years in consulting, we're proud to say we've worked with and for executives from some of the finest companies in the world. In many cases, these relationships have long outlasted the engagements that gave rise to them.",
        "The War On Meetings They\u00e2\u0080\u0099re boring. They\u00e2\u0080\u0099re useless. Everyone hates\nthem. So why can\u00e2\u0080\u0099t we stop having meetings?",
        "Apple's iPhone 7 Is Officially Ditching The Headphone Jack This could upset a lot of people.",
        "Trailblazing Women: Marilyn Johnson, CEO of International Women's Forum An interview with Marilyn Johnson, CEO of the International Women's Forum.",
        "Millennials Love Cars And Detroit Doesn't Know It It's been easy to buy into the myth that young people dislike cars because they're young and poor. But for the approximately 80 million millennials in the U.S., there's a long way to go before they give up car ownership in favor of ride sharing and bikes alone.",
        "3 Do-It-Yourself Investing Pitfalls While the dangers of trying to do your own electrical work are more evident, do-it-yourself (DIY) investing also carries risks for those who aren't careful.",
        "6 Summer Scams And How To Avoid Them As the weather gets warmer, mosquitos and ticks re-enter our lives, and along with them comes their larger cousin, the scam",
        "UA 3411: On Being A Randomly Picked Asian In America, when a source of authority says it randomly singles you out, you should always be wary.",
        "Warren Buffett Cancer Treatment Shows Challenges In Health Care Cost-Cutting A lot of the waste in the health care system comes when a physician orders diagnostic tests that aren't appropriate for the",
        "San Rafael Smoking Ban, Strictest In The Nation, Goes Into Effect \"This legislation will improve the health of all Californians by reducing exposure to smoke that drifts into housing units",
        "Warren Buffett: Congress Is The Biggest Problem Facing Obama In His Second Term (VIDEO) \u00e2\u0080\u009cWhat is right about America just totally dwarfs what\u00e2\u0080\u0099s wrong with Washington,\u00e2\u0080\u009d Buffett told CBS News in a recent interview",
        "Piketty: Bill Gates Told Me He Doesn't Want To Pay More In Taxes \u00e2\u0080\u009cHe told me, \u00e2\u0080\u0098I love everything that\u00e2\u0080\u0099s in your book, but I don\u00e2\u0080\u0099t want to pay more tax.'\"",
        "The Dirty Little Secret That Fast-Food Companies Don't Want You To Know With all of this talk in Washington about cutting back on spending, you'd think they would get to work raising the minimum",
        "Tesla Fires Back At Blogger Who Claims Model S Suspension Defective \"There is no safety defect with the suspensions in either the Model S or Model X,\" the company wrote.",
        "Gulliver's Twitter As more of the marketing function is digitized, some consumers will always exploit their access and amplification to create needless trouble for the companies unfortunate enough to cross their paths. But no matter how hard, brands must always remember that whenever they sink to that level, they lose.",
        "If I Were to Tweet, I'd Ask... With all there is to care about in this world, why does a star of Tom Cruise's magnitude choose to hie off to a remote land to say nice things about a group of stores he isn't likely to be caught alive in? Clearly, Tom was there because he cared, and that fills me with wonder.",
        "Bumble Bans Gun Photos From Members' Profiles AR-15s don't mix with dating app \"rooted in kindness and respect.\"",
        "One Hack That Turns a Loyal Customer Into a Lifelong Loyal Customer Loyal customers are great. Implementing little hacks to guarantee them into loyal-for-life customers like Starwood has done for me this morning? Priceless.",
        "American Airlines Suspends Worker After Ugly Confrontation In Which A Mom Was Allegedly Hit In The Face Video shows the employee challenging a passenger to \"c\u00e2\u0080\u0099mon, hit me.\"",
        "The Best-Run Cities In America In order to determine the performance of the nation\u00e2\u0080\u0099s largest cities, 24/7 Wall St. reviewed the 100 largest U.S. cities",
        "Here\u00e2\u0080\u0099s How The Government Could Close The Staggering Racial Wealth Gap The typical white household is almost 13 times richer than the typical black family.",
        "Women in Business Q&A: Jeni Garrett, CEO and Founder, Woodhouse Day Spa Jeni Garrett was only 21 years old when she opened the first Woodhouse Day Spa in Victoria, TX. Garrett developed an early affinity for business. Growing up on a ranch in southeastern Texas, she began buying and selling cattle when she was only 14.",
        "This $130 Million Hyperloop Hotel Lets You Zip Between Cities Without Leaving Your Hotel Room The actual technology to build a Hyperloop Hotel does not currently exist. But that's not to say it couldn't happen sometime",
        "Hyatt Hotels' Payment System Hacked By Credit-Card Stealing Malware It's not yet known if the attackers succeeded in stealing payment card numbers.",
        "I Quit My Job Every Year, And You Should Too Every December 31st, I quit my job. The next day I decide if I want to take the job again for the New Year. It helps me clear the noise and make sure I am 150 percent behind what I am doing and that it is how I want to spend the majority of my waking hours.",
        "Utilities Face Pressure To Stop Shutting Off Services Amid Coronavirus Pandemic Companies are voluntarily halting disconnects over unpaid bills, but advocates warn there\u00e2\u0080\u0099s no legal obligation to do so amid the COVID-19 outbreak.",
        "Consumers Turning To Tabletop Options In Backlash Against Video Games Hasbro Inc, maker of old standbys like Monopoly and  Risk, says that revenue for its line of games increased 10  percent between 2012 and 2013, and would have grown 7 percent in  2014 if not for unfavorable foreign currency conversions.",
        "Entrepreneurial Women:  3 Ways to Break Through Invisible Barriers to Growth. As a member of the National Women's Business Council, I've had the opportunity to engage with hundreds of female entrepreneurs. During our talks, I couldn't help but happen upon an interesting, yet frustrating discovery. 9 out of every 10 women I spoke with would rather stall their growth than ask for capital.",
        "Bad Sports: Why a Comcast/Time Warner Cable Merger Would Hurt Fans Comcast and Time Warner Cable want the American People's permission to merge. The only answer for federal, state and local governments and regulators is to make a goal-line stand for sports fans and say no.",
        "5 Ways to Tell if Your Content Is Working You've got a blog set up and you're writing furiously, posting every week to get more attention for your brand. Everything you've read tells you that content marketing is both cost-efficient and effective for building a brand reputation and getting more customers, but there's no immediate gauge to tell you whether or not your content is working the way you want it to.",
        "Why Tax Collection Scams Are Getting Harder To Stop Leave it to our friends in Washington to take a bad situation and make it worse.",
        "Good Governance Requires Dimon to End Dual Roles at J. P. Morgan Chase Breaking up the biggest banks because they are perceived as \"too big to fail\" is unrealistic.  What is needed, however, are improvements in the transparency and the accountability of governance in these institutions.",
        "The Best Jobs In The United States Are you a fan of your job? If not, you may want to consider becoming an engineer or dental hygienist. That\u00e2\u0080\u0099s because those",
        "What to Do When You Are Growing Your Core Fast, But Not Fast Enough With over 350M subscribers and growing fast, it would be hard to question LinkedIn's growth. When you compare this number to any of the LinkedIn's traditional competitors, they are doing just fine.",
        "Leading the Way to Purpose and Profit in Business Through Water and Sanitation As I head back to WaterAid's office in New York, I do so full of energy and new ideas. Sustainable Brands has given me a lot to process, think about and share with others. Most unusual of all, on the last afternoon of a four-day conference, I found myself excited and already looking forward to the next one. See you in Detroit.",
        "Occupy Wall Street Ideas May Live On As Movement Fades To contact the editor responsible for this post: Timothy Lavin at tlavin1@bloomberg.net. Lessons of Paris Even as they were",
        "Why Are You Still Unemployed? It is both unfair and inaccurate to place all of the blame for unemployment solely on job seekers. Employers are less than perfect, too. In the current job market, technology has changed many of the \"standard\" practices. So it's a new ball game for both employers and job seekers.",
        "First-Time Investing Tips from Brian Walsh of Saguenay Strathmore Capital Should I invest? This is the question for many in today's still somewhat unstable economic world.",
        "How to Create a Winning Experiential Marketing Campaign Now is the time when most businesses are developing their consumer outreach plans for the 2014. An increasingly popular and effective way for companies to connect with their target audiences is through experiential marketing.",
        "7 Ideas to Help You Keep Your New Year Resolutions Luck is as random as it can get but hard work will surely help to increase the odds of you getting lucky. As we both know",
        "Brand Clash: Coca Cola Making Milk and Apple Making Cars While it is hard to imagine Apple making better cars and Coca Cola making better milk, anything is possible if the branding is done right. Both companies have big wallets and successful corporate brands.",
        "Snapchat Is Reportedly Planning A $25 Billion IPO The company's value has soared in the last five years and it has more users than Twitter.",
        "The Richest And Poorest Cities In America U.S. median household income increased in 2014 to $53,657, an increase of roughly $600 from the previous year. Still, U.S",
        "If They Won't Put It in Writing Then Be Afraid I'll stick to a simple rule of thumb. If someone won't put a questionable instruction in writing and there are no clear policies or guidelines to support that instruction, then I'll let my moral compass guide me.",
        "Reboot With Matt: A 7-Step Marketing Cleanse for the Age of the Customer By rebooting your marketing strategy with a fresh infusion of modern thinking and renewed focus on the customer's digital experience, marketers will be well positioned for the long haul.",
        "Choose Employees Like You're Planning on Climbing Mt. Everest A few weeks ago the crew and I from Behind the Brand made a road trip from LA and headed up North just past San Francisco to the little town of Petaluma in Sonoma County to visit the team from CamelBak.",
        "From Loud Chewing to Cherry-Tomato Spewing: The Five Senses of Office Pet Peeves Are you sitting at your desk right now with your earphones in pretending to listen to music while secretly avoiding your annoying coworker? Well, you're not the only one.",
        "Taking Stock of BlackRock The core problem with this obsession with stock value is that it diverts money away from long-term investments in capital expansion and research and development. The result is a steady decline of productivity which is the key determinant of our economic vigor.",
        "What Chinese Consumers Want Understanding China's consumer culture is a good starting point for understanding the nation itself, as it races toward superpower status. Material similarities between Chinese and Americans mask fundamentally different emotional impulses.",
        "When You Weren't Paying Attention Congress Shook Up The Student Loan Market A small change could mean a big improvement for Americans with federal student loans.",
        "This Is Humanity's Most Important Year Ever \"We can no longer operate at this scale and act as planetary stewards.\"",
        "Volkswagen Works Council Set To Seek Labor Representation At Tenn. Plant HAMBURG/BERLIN, Feb 16 (Reuters) - Volkswagen's works council said it would press on with efforts to set up labour representation",
        "Occupy Wall Street Plans To Surround New York Stock Exchange To Mark Anniversary On Friday, Twitter was ordered by a New York judge to turn over the tweets of one of the protesters arrested on the bridge",
        "3 Financial Realities New Grads Have to Face Go to college, study hard, get good grades, land a job, and rake in the money. Sounds pretty simple, right? Not so fast.",
        "After Historic UAW Defeat at Tennessee Volkswagen Plant, Theories Abound \u00e2\u0080\u009cI am excited,\u00e2\u0080\u009d auto worker Justin King told me as he put on his cowboy boots to get ready for the victory party planned",
        "Trump's Labor Law Enforcer Freezes Worker-Friendly Reforms Made Under Obama The National Labor Relations Board's new general counsel plans to take a much narrower view of worker rights than his predecessor, a new memo shows.",
        "Are You a Risk-Taker? Where would we be today if leaders down through the ages had not risked ridicule, personal safety, health, and wealth for the common good?  But neither did these leaders make careless decisions about what, where, and when to take action.",
        "Trapped Inside The Monster Energy Frat House A woman who worked at the drink company said she was sexually harassed and abruptly fired. This is what can happen when a boys club runs amok.",
        "RBS Libor Rigging Fines May Come From Both U.K. And U.S. Authorities ($1=0.6246 British pounds) (Reporting by Matt Scuffham; Editing by Sophie Walker and Greg Mahlich) Libor and other past mistakes",
        "Help People With Disabilities Tap Their Abilities While some people's disabilities are so significant that they will never be able to work, many people with disabilities can, with some reasonable accommodations, earn more, keep more of what they earn and even build assets for the future. How to make that happen?"
    ],
    "tech": [
        "Google Engineer On Leave After He Claims AI Program Has Gone Sentient Artificially intelligent chatbot generator LaMDA wants\u00c2\u00a0\u00e2\u0080\u009cto be acknowledged as an employee of Google rather than as property,\" says engineer Blake Lemoine.",
        "Uber Now Valued At Almost $51 Billion: WSJ Investors in the latest round include Microsoft.",
        "New York Tech Rising Thanksgiving is a time for looking back -- and thinking about the year ahead. So with that in mind -- I wanted to take this time to share some things I'm thankful for in this growing tech city.",
        "Tim Berners-Lee Honored At London 2012 Olympics Opening Ceremony (VIDEO) What was the joke? Well you couldn't read Google, The Huffington Post, or any other website without Berners-Lee. Why? He's",
        "EU Wants Search Engines To Be More Up Front About Ads Regulators are calling for more transparency from Google and Microsoft.",
        "Pinterest Sued By Former Business Partner Of Early Investor Pinterest has arrived at that special milestone for any successful start-up: The day you get sued by someone who says the",
        "Thoughts About SXSW Companies that don't have active social media accounts and multiple representatives at SXSW are now the exception than the rule. While this is a great thing, I do worry that too many companies focus more on how to use social media to sell product than as a tool to embrace their communities in a true two-way fashion.",
        "6 Times Women In Tech Faced Total BS In 2015 Maybe 2016 will be bett -- [interrupted by deafening laughter]",
        "Facebook Is Making Billions Off Its Smartphone Users The social media giant just reported a shocking revenue jump.",
        "Snapchat Users Don't Want To Start Paying For Lenses The good ones cost 99 cents.",
        "6.5 Million Reportedly Pay For Apple Music Streaming Service Another 8.5 million customers have signed up three-month trials.",
        "Debating Killer Robots While we continue to think about why using robots in war is problematic, from moral, legal and prudential perspectives, we should also continue to press on their touted \"benefits.\"",
        "Rare Pokemon Sparks Massive Stampede In Taiwan It's the end of the world as we know it.",
        "Facebook Shares Numbers On Government Data Requests In Response To PRISM Reports Facebook shared some details Friday night about how frequently it receives government requests for information. AOL does",
        "Problems With Your Pokemon Go App? Check This Site For More Info. In a word: \"Pika-whew!\"",
        "Woman Targeted In 'GamerGate' Harassment Drops Charges Zoe Quinn: \"Trying to get the law to protect me has only continually put me in harm\u00e2\u0080\u0099s way.\"",
        "Copyright Alert System: How ISPs Will 'Break Your Internet' If They Catch You Pirating The RIAA and MPAA, though, have kept a clause in the initiative that lets them demand personal information about copyright",
        "Rare Photos From Steve Jobs' 1996 Return To Apple Appear On Flickr (PHOTOS) Check out the photos from the night Steve Jobs returned to Apple below: Jobs' return came after Apple acquired computer company",
        "Apple Must Clear Another Hurdle In NY Encryption Case It's going back to court despite a previous ruling.",
        "Ellen Pao Won't Stop Talking About Sexism In Tech. And Neither Should You. \u00e2\u0080\u009cYou are not alone. There are millions of women and men who are supporting you and want you to succeed.\"",
        "New iPhone To Be Unveiled By Apple September 10th: Report (Reuters) - Apple Inc, the world's largest technology company, is expected to present its redesigned iPhone in September",
        "One Thing Snapchat Desperately Needs To Copy From Facebook And Twitter That little ghost isn't keeping pace.",
        "Marcos Arenas, Las Vegas Teen, Dies After Being Run Over By Men Who Attempted To Steal His iPad Las Vegas Metro Police spokesman Bill Cassell told the station that many incidences of \"Apple picking\" involve juveniles",
        "Watch The Top 9 YouTube Videos Of The Week If you're looking to see the most popular YouTube videos of the week, look no further. Once again, we're bringing you the",
        "Google Launches Effort To Remove Terrorist And Extremist Content From YouTube The company will take a tougher position on videos containing supremacist or inflammatory religious content.",
        "A Bright Spot in the Dark Side of Technology Next, companies need to flip it around and focus on the next 6-12 months (not the typical next 1-5 years) and ask, \"What",
        "Amazon Is More Worried About Snow Than Strikes \"People in logistics don't want their staff to walk more. They want staff to walk less, because walking less means being",
        "Apple Co-Founder Steve Wozniak On His Tech Preferences, Pet Peeves, And Memories Steve Wozniak pioneered the personal computing industry with the Apple I and II. In a throwback to our 31st issue of Distro",
        "Here's What U.S. Cities Googled The Most In 2015 Americans everywhere seem to be interested in celebrities in distress.",
        "In-Flight Wi-Fi Is About To Get Much Better New, satellite-based Wi-Fi could change how you fly.",
        "AI Day Will Replace Christmas as the Most Important Holiday in Less Than 25 Years Some religious people, anti-transhumanists, and neo-Luddites complain that an advanced AI will destroy human civilization. Most scientists and technologists find those worries laughable. Most of them think that AI will usher in a new age of scientific discovery, medical advancement, and technological sophistication only imagined before in science fiction.",
        "Space Debris Demands a Global Approach While there is still more ground to cover, if we work together as a global industry, these immediate steps can help ensure a dramatic movie plot does not become our stark reality.",
        "\"Likes\" Are the New Links Links may be the foundation on which the Internet was built, but they are not its future. \"Likes\" have become the new links that drive our connections online.",
        "WhatsApp Finally Adds Fully-Encrypted Video Calling Service The new service will provide another means for people to communicate without fear of eavesdropping.",
        "Android May Have A Big Problem In Europe European regulators are investigating Google's deals with phone makers.",
        "MONDAY: Major Heads To Roll At Twitter The company also reportedly plans to add two new board members.",
        "Former Reddit CEO Ellen Pao: The Trolls Are Winning I have just endured one of the largest trolling attacks in history. And I have just been blessed with the most astonishing",
        "The 'Reset Plug' Will Save You When Your Internet Craps Out You'll never have to get up and fiddle with your WiFi router again.",
        "Spotify May Reserve Some New Music For Paying Subscribers That free subscription is looking less and less appealing.",
        "That Time 'Gilmore Girls' Predicted The Future Of Online News Lorelai Gilmore, you are an utter genius.",
        "Microsoft's Windows Phone Ads Mocking The iPhone Go Private...Because They Were Terrible The conversation pokes fun at Apple's rumored iWatch, colors of the new iPhones and lack of innovation. The Next Web received",
        "Hackers Shaking Down Pennsylvania Democrats and U.S. Progressive Groups Computers are infected with ransomware and attackers seek Bitcoin payoffs. Signs again point to Russia.",
        "Huffington Magazine: 10 Lessons From the First 10 Issues As we publish our 10th issue of Huffington magazine and in anticipation of our September 10th Design and Tech Meet Up in partnership with SPD, here's a snapshot of lessons learned developing and publishing a new digital-only magazine.",
        "Hackers Attack High-Profile Twitter Accounts, Post Swastikas And Pro-Erdogan Content Amnesty International, Duke University and Forbes were among the verified accounts affected by the hack.",
        "'Trap Adventure 2' Might Be The Most Infuriatingly Difficult Game Ever If you like chucking your phone across the room, this is the game for you.",
        "Critics Eating Crow: Google+ Becomes Second Largest Social Platform There is an immense opportunity for marketers as Google's services are further connected through the G+ social layer.",
        "Mark Zuckerberg: Mobile Is Facebook's Biggest Challenge Facebook Inc. (FB) Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg said his hardest job right now is figuring out how to adapt the",
        "Velvin Hogan, Foreman In Apple Samsung Case, Says Jury Didn't Want $1 Billion Verdict To Be 'Just A Slap On The Wrist' Apple's damages expert testified that Samsung earned margins of roughly 35.5 percent on the products at issue in the lawsuit",
        "New 'Star Wars: Battlefront' Trailer Lands -- And It's Slicker Than A Greased-Up 3PO Be still, my Ewok heart!",
        "Google Introduces A New Way To Screen Telemarketers But there's a catch. \u00f0\u009f\u0091\u0080",
        "Do You Have An Online Impersonator? Facebook Tests New Anti-Imposter Security Feature Most users of the social network will now be automatically alerted if a copycat account is detected.",
        "Apple Doubles Women, Minority Hires But Remains Very White Things are improving, but there's still work to be done.",
        "These Are The Gorgeous New Android Phones You Have To Care About The latest devices from Samsung and LG look amazing.",
        "3 Password Tools That Can Simplify Your Life -- And Protect You From Hackers -- CONS: Limited login functionality on the mobile (premium) version, which is only available for Android and iOS, but Downey",
        "No, Facebook Didn't Crush Upworthy's Traffic Media analysts have been buzzing this last week about how this chart proves that a December change to the Facebook newsfeed algorithm is bringing the Upworthy media empire crashing down.",
        "iPhone 6 With Fingerprint Detection, New iPad's Weight Loss And Release Dates: This Week In Apple Rumors Hello, ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to This Week In Apple Rumors, our regular look back at all of the week's unconfirmed",
        "Boy Takes Home Top Prize In Competition For Girls In STEM Pretty Curious, a U.K. program aimed at getting girls interested in STEM careers, asks on its website, \u00e2\u0080\u009cwhy aren\u00e2\u0080\u0099t more girls",
        "'Serial' Season 2 Will Launch On Pandora Season 1 will also be available on Pandora on Nov. 24.",
        "Tim Cook Swipes At FBI During New iPhone Event \"We need to decide as a nation the amount of power the government has on our data and on our privacy.\"",
        "Google\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Unknown Campaign To Track the World\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Hottest Startups By Davey Alba for WIRED. Google calls it Project Sand Hill. Since 2012, Suman Prasad and his team have worked with various",
        "UC Berkeley Alerts 80,000 People After Cyber Attack A system that stores social security and bank account numbers was hacked.",
        "43 Best Vines Of The Week, In One Video: Aug. 25th - Aug. 31st, 2013 Vine, Twitter\u00e2\u0080\u0099s micro-video social network, is perhaps the best form of entertainment for Generation Distraction. With a",
        "Tinder's Twitter Account Has Emotional Meltdown Over Vanity Fair Article This is what happens when you create an app everyone hates, but can't put down.",
        "Apple Is Said To Discuss An Investment In Twitter Apple, which has stumbled in its efforts to get into social media, has talked with Twitter in recent months about making",
        "Take 'Star Wars' Home With The Painfully Cute BB-8 Droid The Force is strong with this one.",
        "Sarah Stierch, Wikimedia Fellow, Wants To Bring More Women To Wikipedia Whether small things like women\u00e2\u0080\u0099s movies, fashion, makeup, or things that are extremely critical to women\u00e2\u0080\u0099s lives, like abortion",
        "Interest In 'Gun Control' Is Fading, Google Data Shows As usual, people appear to care in the days following a major shooting -- and then they lose interest.",
        "The Most Popular Hanukkah Videos to Ever Hit YouTube We've already presented the best holiday light displays of 2012 and now we're serving up the most popular Hanukkah videos ever to hit YouTube!",
        "Kindle Fire HD 4G: FCC Approval Still Needed But they say it's very unusual for a company to announce major new products without first getting the sign-off from the agency",
        "How Black Twitter Helped Take Down The Confederate Flag The story behind a hashtag that helped transform the nation's opinion at hyper-speed.",
        "Police Tracking Of Cellphones Raises Privacy Fears WASHINGTON -- Law enforcement tracking of cellphones, once the province mainly of federal agents, has become a powerful and",
        "Do What You Love, But Don't Get Sick I talked to quite a few independent artists who told me about how hard it has been to pay out-of-pocket for health insurance. One artist I love told me his wife's Urinary Tract Infection (UTI) counted as a pre-existing condition and makes their payment outrageously expensive.",
        "Curate or Be Curated: The Coming Age of the Curation Economy The cure for information overload is coherent curation -- data-driven discovery managed by skilled, thoughtful, and in some cases expert curators. Much as the quality of a restaurant is created by the chef, the quality of the curated end-product is going to be made by the curator.",
        "How To Save Money On Your Data Plan A few simple tweaks can go a long way.",
        "After Criticism, Uber Adds Wheelchair Option In D.C. This could be good news for people with disabilities who live in the nation's capital.",
        "Google Will Team Up With Ford To Build Self-Driving Cars: Report The Internet search giant reportedly plans to bring driverless vehicles to the market by 2020.",
        "How Does Facebook Make Money? Facebook's IPO filing this week confirmed what we already knew: Facebook makes the vast majority of its money by selling",
        "Pastor Outed In Ashley Madison Hack Commits Suicide \u00e2\u0080\u009cHe talked about depression. He talked about having his name on there, and he said he was just very, very sorry.\u00e2\u0080\u009d",
        "Apple Supply Chain Mastery Is Key To CEO Tim Cook's Success Insiders say he is a refreshing presence after the prickly Jobs, who was admired but feared. Cook is also known for his ability",
        "WhatsApp Co-Founder Says People Should Delete Facebook Facebook bought WhatsApp for $19 billion in 2014.",
        "The Collective (Un)Consciousness; Remember Your Dreams I have found as we get older and our dreams become dictated by what society says we should be buying, dreaming, and doing, we have forgotten our very visions, and what drives us in a deep meaningful way to be who we are.",
        "WATCH: 60 Seconds of Social Media The tablet wars are heating up. Can Amazon's new Kindle Fire HD take on Apple's iPad?",
        "VTech Hack Leaves Millions Of Parents -- And Their Kids -- Exposed The breached database contained children's names, genders and birth dates.",
        "Lawmakwers To Vote On Measure Including Controversial Cybersecurity Bill This Week The bill, which encourages companies to share cyber threat information with the government, has raised concerns about privacy and transparency.",
        "The Huffington Post Is Hiring A Tech Reporter The ideal candidate will have at least three years of experience writing for major publications and a demonstrated interest in gadgets, tech business, the future of our planet and sustainability.",
        "Facebook And Google Have New Weapons In Place To Block Extremist Videos This is big.",
        "'Sandwich Van' Goes Viral On Twitter After Receptionist Accidentally Sends Sexy Emails To Co-Workers A spokesperson for the company said the couple had chosen to resign from their jobs, even though no disciplinary action had",
        "Cathedral Moves Sculpture Because Texters Keep Bumping Into It \"The Kiss\" has caused quite a few headaches.",
        "It's Not Easy To Be Jenna Marbles A young woman with magenta-streaked hair stands in her bathroom, speaking to a webcam. In a hushed tone, she chews over a",
        "PayPal Back Up After Suffering From Temporary Global Outage Hundreds of users complained their payments wouldn't go through.",
        "Why Wait Until Something Breaks? Let's Try Predictive Maintenance Why wait until something is broken to fix it? That's what a growing number of companies are asking themselves these days.",
        "Inside The Weird World Of Tracking Gangs On Social Media But gang graffiti today has taken a turn for the worse. It's going viral, and virtual. Gang members aren't just writing on",
        "Video Games Rarely Warn For Smoking The Way They Do For Violence \"The connection between viewing smoking imagery and adolescent smoking uptake has been well established by numerous studies, yet tobacco imagery in video games seems to be flying under the radar.\"",
        "American Women Are Getting More Sleep Than Men Women get an average of 20 more minutes of sleep nightly, according to a study by Jawbone.",
        "Good Games -- Is It possible? I don't think people who play Zynga games are bad. Just like I don't think the grandma in Vegas is bad. They're just sad.",
        "Heartbleed: Free Tool to Check if That Site Is Safe I'm sure you've heard the news about Heartbleed by now (unless you're in vacation wonderland and have taken a tech break). This is a serious vulnerability in the core of the Internet and is something we all should be concerned about.",
        "Our Main Weapon Against Hackers Is A 30-Year-Old Law Its vague wording often leads to outlandish maximum sentences for hackers -- and some lawmakers want them to be even stricter.",
        "Surprising Number Of Americans Would Chop Off A Finger To Stay Online Ouch.",
        "The Last Mile, San Quentin's Startup Demo Day Program For Prison Inmates San Quentin, a prison located 25 miles north of San Francisco, just held its first startup demo day for inmates who are learning",
        "Good Grief As I sit alone, writing with this actual Papermate pen, which writes words you can feel, words firm and clear, that we are evolving into translucent creatures; Internet sprites, who will Twitter, text and pinterest through cyberspace."
    ],
    "weddings": [
        "Marriage: Is It Really Work? Along with the rise of marriage counseling in the 1950s, and a deep-seated fear of divorce, came the idea that marriage is work -- and that it's mostly the wife's job to do it -- and a slew of relationship \"experts\" and a multimillion-dollar self-help industry to help us with that.",
        "7 Signs He's Never Going To Propose It is very important for a woman to know how the man she is dating feels and whether he will eventually step up and propose. These 7 signs help you clarify if he thinks your relationship is for keeps or just fun for right now.",
        "12 Valentine's Day Proposal Dos and Don'ts Proposing on Valentine's Day can be tricky. On one hand, it is the most romantic day of the year so it can be a good day to pop the question. On the other hand, proposing on a holiday can turn super cheesy if it isn't done properly.",
        "Jamie Rohrs, Colorado Shooting Survivor, Proposes After Family Escapes Death The couple were in a theater in Aurora, Colorado, watching a midnight showing of \"The Dark Knight Rises\" with Legarreta's",
        "How To Cut Your Wedding Guest List From long-lost aunts and uncles to your father-in-law's best friend's cousin, it's easy to let your wedding guest list spin",
        "Wedding Speech: Kid Delivers Rambling, Awesome Reception Toast (VIDEO) Check out cute photos of kids at weddings in the slideshow below, then weigh in with your thoughts on including children",
        "Facebook: How We Cope With Remembering All The Significant Events In Our Lives They say memories last forever - yet try to remember the date a significant event happened and it could be more of a struggle",
        "LEGO Wedding: Couple Chooses Favorite Childhood Toy As Nuptial Theme (PHOTOS) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest. \"From there, we just sort of decided that",
        "7 Tips For Looking 10 Pounds Thinner In Your Wedding Dress I can't tell you how many of my clients proclaim that they WILL lose 10 pounds before the big day! Who doesn't want to look fabulous on their wedding day? Well here are some helpful tips just in case your diet plan doesn't work out!",
        "Couple Who Wed On 9/10/11 Give Birth To Baby Boy On 11/12/13 On Tuesday, thousands of couples rushed to the altar in order to get hitched on an iconic date -- 11/12/13. Any one of them",
        "Blake Lively's Wedding Planner Dishes On Blake's Big Day Click through the slideshow below to see photos of the couple over the years. According to Tara Gu\u00c3\u00a9rard, the wedding planner",
        "11 Things Women Really Want From Wedding Night Sex I say, add \"getting laid\" to your wedding day to-do list, right alongside all the other tasks you'll go bat shit crazy over. And, if you're gonna make it a priority, you might as well get it right, no?",
        "'Four Weddings More Big Blunders': Biggest Wedding Mishaps (VIDEO) \"It seemed a little dangerous,\" said Missy, one of the brides judging the wedding. \"And then they actually dropped him.\" TLC's",
        "Typical Wedding Photos: 10 Clich\u00c3\u00a9 Poses We've Seen Too Many Times (PHOTOS) Couples are taking back their weddings and doing their Big Days their own way more and more. But, unfortunately, wedding",
        "20 Things Only Married People Will Understand 18) The importance of having married friends. You may have had serious and meaningful relationships before, but something",
        "Marriage Proposal Fails: Couple Washed Away By Huge Ocean Wave (VIDEO) Marriage proposals at the beach can be beautiful, photogenic, and quite memorable -- especially if a giant ocean wave decides",
        "Celebrity High School Sweethearts Who Are Still Together Today (PHOTOS) It might seem like big celebrities meet their husbands and wives on movies sets, on tour with their bands or at exclusive",
        "Runner Marriage Proposal: Boyfriend Intercepts Girlfriend During Run To Propose (PHOTO) Andrews told HuffPost Weddings in an email that Taylor did a double-take as she ran by the table, before realizing that it",
        "Aaron Paul, Fiancee, Celebrate Upcoming Wedding In Las Vegas (PHOTO) Last month, Paul asked Ellie Goulding to perform at his wedding, and she said yes! Aaron Paul and fiancee Lauren Parsekian",
        "IKEA Wedding: Couple Meets, Marries In Store (VIDEO) Eight years ago, Shirley Stewart and Berkeley \u00e2\u0080\u009cRashid\u00e2\u0080\u009d Smith met in the frame department of a New Jersey IKEA. And on Saturday",
        "The Most Brilliant Use Of Amazon's Wedding Registry Volunteers from Occupy Sandy, which is operating a large grassroots cleanup effort in the New York City area, has a clever",
        "Couple Says Doing Porn Together Makes Their Marriage Stronger Huffington Post Live's Nancy Redd spoke with amateur porn stars Falicha Karr and Steve Bigs -- a couple featured on do-it",
        "The 5 C's of White Gold vs. Platinum \"Should I set the diamond (or other precious stone) in platinum or white gold?\" From my experience in the diamond business for over a decade, here are my thoughts about the pros and cons of white gold versus platinum.",
        "Taco Bell Weddings And Engagements Are More Common Than You Think (PHOTOS) Rob Poetsch, a Taco Bell spokesperson, explained to HuffPost Weddings via email that the company has \"some of the most dedicated",
        "Kid At Wedding Has A Blast With His Mom's Gown (VIDEO) Wondering how to entertain little kids at the reception? You don't need crayons, stickers or bubbles -- all you need is a",
        "The Top 5 Moments From Bridal Fashion Week Spring 2014 It's easy to get lost in a sea of white, lace and tulle at bridal market -- the jam-packed, semi-annual week in which top",
        "The Hottest Celebrity Engagement Ring Trend If you were a celebrity getting engaged in 2013, odds are very good the question was popped with a cushion cut diamond set in a pave halo setting.",
        "50 Shades Of Frosting (And Other Green Baking Tips) If you want to bake your own wedding goodies, you can green everything from the ingredients to the presentation. This list of ideas starts in the kitchen and ends with a beautiful cupcake stand for your guests to \"Ooh and Aah\" over.",
        "Surviving the Dreaded Momzilla Brides tend to forget how emotionally invested mothers can be as her little princess gets married.   Momzillas come in different shapes and forms, but all need to be regarded carefully as to not risk the relationship between mother and daughter.",
        "Friend Engaged And You Hate Her Fiance? Here's How To React Politely (VIDEO) Is your friend engaged to someone who is \"medium racist\" or \"uses the word 'feminist' as an insult\"? We're sorry to hear",
        "Hidden Wedding Camera: Big Day Captured From Inside Bridal Bouquet (VIDEO) A San Diego couple discovered a unique way to record every moment of their wedding by hiding a small camera inside the bride's",
        "Wedding Shower Etiquette When you are a bride-to-be, you want to do everything right, and there's a lot to get right. Along with planning the wedding and all the myriad details that involves, it's important to know the etiquette of wedding showers.",
        "10 Emerald Weddings Ideas Inspired By Pantone's 2013 Color Of The Year Pantone announced the 2013 color on Thursday... emerald green! In honor of the jewel tone, I've rounded up some of the best emerald green wedding ideas on Loverly.",
        "Our Top 10 Wedding Stories Of 2013 - CNN.com We said we would, and you said, \"I do!\" CNN Living launched the Matrimony series in June, and we've been thrilled to see",
        "An Open Letter To Everyone I've Ever Loved This is a love letter to my husband. The man I'll be with forever. The man I can love because of everyone else who has ever loved me. Everyone else who has ever loved me well and loved me badly.",
        "Couple Injured In Boston Marathon Bombing Will Get A Fairy Tale Wedding The Knot heard about the couple's hardship and chose them as the 2014 Dream Wedding recipients. The couple's entire wedding",
        "Katy Perry Catches Bouquet At Grammys Mass Wedding As wedding tradition has it, the person who catches the bouquet is the next to get married. The bouquet catch comes amid",
        "Helicopter Marriage Proposal: Ring Flies To Bride-To-Be On Tiny Helicopter (VIDEO) This isn't the first time a remote-controlled vehicle has played a role in popping the question. In 2011, a man attached",
        "\u00e2\u0080\u0098Redneck' Florida Couple Hold Wedding In Mud Pit Carina and Kodie Umphenour aren\u00e2\u0080\u0099t ashamed to label themselves \u00e2\u0080\u009crednecks,\u00e2\u0080\u009d and their Saturday wedding proved it. The camouflage",
        "Vegas Wedding: Mobile Ministers Perform Curbside Weddings The Wedding Wagon's price tag includes photos and a minister -- even a t-shirt if you book by the end of July -- but not",
        "Facebook Marriage Proposal: Social Media Helps Techie Boyfriend Pop The Question (VIDEO) In a proposal that combines the two social media platforms, Facebook employee Jon Park asked his girlfriend, Twitter employee",
        "Why There's No Substitute for Live Music at Your Wedding Your wedding is a special day, maybe the most special day in your life, and there is nothing more ceremonious or celebratory than live music.",
        "This Is Marriage I thought; this is marriage. One day you're shopping for shoes at the outlets and just a few weeks later, the new shoes your husband reluctantly bought for himself will sit, discarded, in a room down the hall while someone else breathes for him.",
        "These Movie Poster Parodies Are Spot-On (And A Kick-Ass Wedding Gift Too) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest. Sign up for our newsletter here. [h/t AdWeek",
        "Getting Married in Spain Residency Requirement And Waiting Period There is no residency requirement for marriage in Spain, but civil registry officials",
        "The Worst Question A Wedding Vendor Can Ask A Bride-To-Be \"When I got engaged and started planning my wedding a few months ago, I was shocked and annoyed that I would call other vendors",
        "Brad Pitt, Angelina Jolie Wedding: Pitt Rumored To Have Chosen Specialty Booze For Upcoming Wedding The Sun reports that Pitt has picked an array of wines for his impending nuptials, including a ros\u00c3\u00a9 called \"Pink Floyd,\" according",
        "When Your Spouse Asks You to Take a Lover Have you ever wondered what you would do if your spouse was disabled by an illness or injury and was no longer able to have sexual relations with you?",
        "Star Trek Wedding: Trekkies Hold Klingon Wedding In Britain (VIDEO) Reuters reports that Swedish couple Jossie Sockertopp, 23, and Sonnie Gustavsson, 29, tied the knot in a Klingon ceremony",
        "ACM Awards: Red Carpet Dresses That Could Be Wedding Gowns (PHOTOS) Country music's biggest stars walked the red carpet at Sunday's Academy of Country Music Awards, but some of them looked",
        "Miley Cyrus Engaged To Liam Hemsworth: Jada Pinkett Smith Offers Advice Jada Pinkett Smith remembers a thing or two about young love \u00e2\u0080\u0093 and is willing to share some words of wisdom for a lasting",
        "Celebrity Wedding Crashers: John Travolta And 7 Other Stars Who Have Crashed Weddings John Travolta crashed a wedding in Georgia last week, leaving the couple with an unforgettable memory and great photos (take",
        "Everything You Need to Know Before Shopping for Wedding Lingerie Over the years, lingerie specialist Susan Nethero of myintimacy.com has fitted hundreds of brides. Read on for her sage advice on shopping for the best wedding undergarments.",
        "College Football Schedules Holding Up Wedding Plans There are any number of reasons to get nervous about planning a wedding, but the realignment of college football conferences",
        "Game's Wedding To Be Televised In 'Marrying The Game' Cambridge and Game have been together for eight years and have two children together, 5-year-old King Justice and 2-year",
        "What the Wedding Industry Needs to Know About Gay Weddings There is an LGBT culture (just as there's a Jewish culture, a Southern culture, etc.) and with that culture come unique trends, traditions and experiences.",
        "John Legend Wedding Location Revealed: Report \"I have the dress and I love it!\" she said. \"This one was it, I knew right away. It's classic and ivory. It's got some modern",
        "Father's Day: The Most Memorable Dads At Weddings (VIDEO) Weddings are a big day for the bride and groom, but they're also a big day for dads. What's more special than seeing your",
        "All The Time In The World Four and a half months after his sudden deployment, Jeff was sent home. The girls and I made T-shirts with catchy slogans: Welcome Home Baghdaddy; Glad You're Back from Iraq.",
        "Looking For Love At A Wedding? Here's What You Need To Know (INFOGRAPHIC) Click through the slideshow below for some of the most interesting findings from The Knot's annual Real Weddings Study. If",
        "No Urge To Splurge On A Bridal Gown? Get A Bridesmaid Dress And Accessorize I\u00e2\u0080\u0099m practical. Never dreamed of having a lavish gown. Didn't want to endure a long hunt for bargains. So four little words",
        "VMA Dresses: Wedding Gown Inspiration For Brides (PHOTOS) Sunday night's MTV VMAs were nothing short of saucy -- an adjective not often associated with weddings. But there was still",
        "Sean Parker's Wedding Photo Shows Incredible Sets, Costumes (PHOTO) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest. The couple got engaged in April 2011 after",
        "Marriage Is For Losers In marriage, losing is letting go of the need to fix everything for your partner, listening to their darkest parts with a heartache rather than a solution. It's being even more present in the painful moments than in the good times.",
        "5 Wedding Details You Can Stop Overthinking Any bride who's stayed up until 2 a.m. trying to pick the perfect font for her wedding invitations can probably relate to Kelly Clarkson, who just announced that she's scrapping her elaborate wedding and eloping instead.",
        "Movie Trailer Proposal: Man Proposes in Movie Theater With Sweet Film (VIDEO) After Matt Still's movie trailer proposal went viral in 2011, many couples have gotten engaged with the help of a homemade",
        "Groom's Cake Is Replica Of Mississippi State Football Stadium (PHOTO) Rawson told HuffPost Weddings that his mother, who is not a professional cake decorator, made the cake. It took her three",
        "Wedding Speech: Father Of The Bride Delivers Heartfelt, Hilarious Toast (VIDEO) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest. Weddings can be an emotional time for the",
        "Long Engagements: Celebrities Who Had Very Long Engagements They say you can't hurry love and, as it turns out, you can't hurry engagements either. While the trend in Hollywood might",
        "Social Media At Weddings: The Dos And Dont's More from Lover.ly: If you're a guest, DON'T whip out your phone during the ceremony if you don't know whether the bride",
        "The Secret of Staying Married A recent conversation about two friends who were enjoying a super second marriage with a bevy of nice kids and grands led to a bit of speculation about later marriage, divorce and why long marriages are going the way of dinosaurs.",
        "Keeping the Pillow Talk Light Now I know to engage with him at dinner time, well before bed, so that he can \"process\" his thoughts for the day, and he knows that I do not like it when he comes to bed ready to chat about his challenges. So he tries not to. Which is kind.",
        "Engagement Ring Photos: A Step-By-Step Guide To Shooting Your Bling 4. Use The Macro Setting On Your Camera 5. Get Creative! 1. Get Your Nails Done We've seen gazillions of \"typical\" engagement",
        "Together Apart: Commuter Marriages On The Rise In The U.S Now married 13 years, the couple jokes they had to go through customs just to date. Little did they know four years ago when",
        "Wedding Songs For A Black Tie Affair More from Martha Stewart Weddings: 7. \"Fever\" - Beyonce Peggy Lee made this diddy famous in the '50s, and in this sultry",
        "Wedding Photobomb: Awkward Photo Fails At Nuptials (PHOTOS) After all, there's nothing like a photo of Uncle Lester lurking in the background while the bride and groom share a passionate",
        "The Response to This Couple's Same-sex Wedding Will Blow You Away Meredith Hendrix-Jackson\u00e2\u0080\u0099s parents refused to come to her wedding. Instead, her love-filled wedding photos brought sixty",
        "Be Fearless: Face Your Pre-Wedding Stress With Confidence Throughout the year, a lot of soon-to-be married couples come to me for pre-wedding stress and anxiety.  This stress can come very close to breaking up the engagement and open up family issues to the point where people go radio silent on each other.",
        "Groom's Cake Shaped Like Stack Of Cash Displayed At Wedding (PHOTO) While this may not be the classiest groom's cake we've ever seen, it is certainly one of the most unique! Keep in touch! Check",
        "Fall Wedding Trends Revealed By Designer Melissa Sweet (VIDEO) Watch the video above for more on the hottest dress trends (and click here to see the full segment), then click through the",
        "Walk Down The Aisle: 12 Women Reveal Who 'Gave Them Away' On The Big Day Tradition dictates that it's the bride's father who walks her down aisle during the wedding ceremony. But what if you don't",
        "How to Break Wedding Tradition It's millennials who are most likely to toss tradition aside, and it's millennials who are getting married right now. But that doesn't mean that everyone at the wedding will appreciate it.",
        "Brandy Engaged To Music Executive Ryan Press (REPORT) Us Weekly reports that 33-year-old actress/R&B singer Brandy Norwood is engaged to music executive Ryan Press. In August",
        "How To Use Pinterest To Plan A Wedding Pinterest can help you communicate to others -- and clarify for yourself -- what you want your day to look like. Instead of tearing pages out of magazines or bookmarking entire web pages, you can organize inspiring images on virtual pinboards.",
        "6 Tips for Slashing Honeymoon Costs If you're not interested in paying several grand for the honeymoon, check out these six tips for slashing your honeymoon costs",
        "Gay Marriage: Why Same-Sex Couples Should Get Married Related Links: Do I Have A Daddy? Pray the Gay Away Before we got married (or had a \u00e2\u0080\u009ccommitment ceremony\u00e2\u0080\u009d as some prefer",
        "25 Telltale Signs You're A Military Spouse 20. You have your spouse's social security number memorized, but when asked about your own... 25. And while some days, it",
        "A Case For Vibrant Lips I think it's pretty much safe to say that every bride-to-be devises an enormous 'To Do' list before the Big Day (it's a checklist maker's ultimate dream!) and let's be honest, how her face will look while standing at the altar is usually near the top of it.",
        "Flower Alternatives: Feathers, Streamers And Other Wedding Decor Ideas (PHOTOS) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest. By Kellee Khalil for Lover.ly More from Lover.ly",
        "Marriage & Birth Control: What's Right For Your Relationship? So, you found the perfect guy, you settled down and you married him. Now what? Then comes a baby in a baby carriage, right",
        "9 Reasons Newlyweds Don't Have Sex On Their Wedding Night 9. Neither of us felt like having sex (4 percent) Keep in touch! Check out HuffPost Weddings on Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest",
        "5 Surefire Ways To Avoid A Wedding Disaster Planning your wedding day can be one of the most stressful moments of your life. But it doesn't have to be.",
        "A Promise to My Daughter I know when my beautiful, amazing daughter gets married, it will be an incredible time in her life. And I want it to be exactly what she wants. As it should be, I want her wedding dress to be an expression of her style and personality. No one else's should come into play. Especially not mine.",
        "Wedding Planner Colin Cowie's 5 Tips For Planning The Perfect Bridal Shower Event planner Colin Cowie is quite the expert when it comes to parties and over-the-top affairs. The NYC-based Cowie has",
        "Ask Amsale: Wedding Attire Questions From the dress to d\u00c3\u00a9cor details, whether you're a bride-to-be, a bridesmaid, or the MOB, tweet your questions to @huffpostwedding with the hashtag #AskAmsale and I'll share my best advice for achieving sheer perfection on the big day.",
        "Bride Meltdowns In Movies: The Ultimate Compilation (VIDEO) Click through the slideshow below to learn about 30 real-life wedding disasters. HuffPost Weddings rounded up some of the",
        "Bobak Ferdowsi, NASA 'Mohawk Guy,' Inundated With Marriage Proposals On Twitter NASA had a very big day on Monday, with the successful landing of their newest Mars rover, \"Curiosity.\" But one thing is",
        "Gaming The Green Card System: One Immigrant's Fake Marriage Tale Some immigrants who game the green-card system don\u00e2\u0080\u0099t get caught. This 36-year-old Brooklyn gay man from Asia explains how",
        "Groom Involvement Weddings have traditionally been all about the bride. But experts say male participation in all things \"I Do\" is on the rise",
        "8 Engagement Party Theme Ideas More from The Knot: 10 wedding rules you can break Beach Clam Bake Engagement Party Photo: Elizabeth Lloyd Photography/The"
    ],
    "sports": [
        "Rafael Nadal Wins 10th French Open Title Nadal defeated Stan Wawrinka in just over two hours.",
        "USA Gymnastics Suspends Former Olympic Coach Who Worked Closely With Nassar (UPDATE) John Geddert operated two gyms where Nassar molested girls.",
        "Is the Commissioner an Arbitrator? In the Brady case, if the parties are not able to settle the matter, the Federal District Court in Manhattan will have to determine whether the Commissioner's decision was \"arbitrary and capricious,\" not whether it \"drew its essence from the collective bargaining agreement.\"",
        "Chip Kelly, Nick Foles, and the 2013 Philadelphia Eagles: Five Definitive Answers The Philadelphia Eagles surprising season came to a screeching halt Saturday night against the New Orleans Saints. So deal with the drool as best you can and consider these five questions regarding your Philadelphia Eagles.",
        "Jozy Altidore Goal Vs. Germany: U.S. Soccer Striker Scores With 'Sumptuous Volley' (VIDEO) On a soccer field, it looks like this: ESPN commentator Ian Darke narrated the superb strike in equally superb fashion: U.S",
        "An Open Letter to Daniel Murphy From a Gay Dad Let me try to explain why what you said was not an innocuous sound byte, but rather an offensive statement.  First, I do not have a lifestyle. I didn't choose my sexuality the same way you didn't choose yours. Second, being gay is not what defines me.",
        "Brazil Finally Wins Olympic Soccer Gold And Everybody Is In Tears Neymar cried. And then so did everyone else.",
        "Olympic Gymnast Fights Through Tears And A Torn ACL To Help Team Make Finals Andrea Tobas put his knee on the line for his country.",
        "New Zealand 'All Whites' Soccer Team Drops Nickname The team said it was carrying out a variety of measures aimed at improving its cultural inclusivity.",
        "Here Are The Most Popular Throwback Jerseys In Each State Kobe's pretty most popular in a lot of states, but not in California.",
        "Boeheim Stays in the Picture: Syracuse's Script Just Keeps Getting Better Usually, when we say that there should be a movie about a team, it's in the vein of the generic sports flick. But this script is the kind that Michael Mann might direct. It's gritty. It's full of sordid details.",
        "German Soccer Team Kneels During Game In Solidarity With NFL Players \u00e2\u0080\u009cFor a tolerant Berlin and an open-minded world, now and forevermore!\u00e2\u0080\u009d",
        "U.S. Women's Hockey Players Stand United In Fair Pay Boycott USA Hockey set a deadline for the team members to decide whether to play. But they're not backing down.",
        "Ryan Lochte Is 32. We Shouldn't Treat Him Like A Kid. Being a \"magnificent athlete\" shouldn't absolve you from living by the same rules as everyone else.",
        "Jadeveon Clowney Hit: Rajion Neal Of Tennessee Rocked Like Vincent Smith Of Michigan (VIDEOS/GIF) With the unranked Volunteers driving against the No. 11 Gamecocks in the first quarter on Saturday at Neyland Stadium, Clowney",
        "Father Holds Up Son For Foul Ball Catch During Reds-Yankees Game (VIDEO) Andy Pettitte may have been the player of the game on Friday night after pitching eight shutout innings while only giving",
        "Giant Man Shakes Hands With Normal-Sized Reporter Trust us. The San Antonio Spurs' Boban Marjanovi\u00c4\u0087 is gargantuan.",
        "Lindsey Vonn Tweets Fierce War Cry For 'Likely' Last Olympic Downhill Race \"Count on it.\"",
        "Kenny Sailors, Jump Shot Pioneer, Dies At 95 A basketball legend, a veteran, a mentor, and a beloved friend and family man.",
        "North Carolina Ball Team Threw Retirement Party For Its Bat Dog Miss Babe Ruth will retire after appearing in 649 consecutive games.",
        "Global Soccer's Backslapping, Backstabbing Backroom Deal-making Politics World soccer is about to get another taste of the global soccer's wheeling and dealing with the likely election of Sheikh Ahmad Al-Fahad Al-Sabah, the head of the Association of National Committees (ANOC), the Olympic Council of Asia (OCA) and the influential Solidarity Commission of the International Olympic Committee.",
        "Marcus Mariota Featured In Inspiring Beats By Dre Ad The video follows the Heisman winner through his hometown of Honolulu.",
        "Al Michaels Makes Harvey Weinstein Joke In NFL Telecast, Regrets It Viewers noticed.",
        "Baseball Gods Choosing A Team In NYC New York has two baseball teams. The New York Yankees and the New York Mets. For as long as I can remember, except for the",
        "Stunning Photos Capture The 2018 Olympics' Closing Ceremony In All Its Glory The action-packed ceremony featured everything from roller-blading pandas to K-pop musicians.",
        "Greg Hardy Is Going To Play On Sunday Without Ever Apologizing Nearly a year and a half later, Greg Hardy has yet to apologize for his domestic violence offense.",
        "Manny Pacquiao Continues To Spew Homophobic Trash After Nike Cuts Ties The boxer won't back away from his recent anti-gay remarks.",
        "Lydia Ko Wins New Zealand Women's Open: 15-Year-Old Golfer Ko Captures Third Pro Title CHRISTCHURCH, New Zealand \u00e2\u0080\u0093 It was a remarkable display of poise and precision. Lydia Ko, the 15-year-old Kiwi who isn\u00e2\u0080\u0099t",
        "The Nature of the NFL Could Be the Downfall of the NFL Players want to have a life when they leave the game. They don't want their brains to be turned to mush. Seeing what has happened, it's easy to understand these players' points of view.",
        "You Can Now Access NBA Games Via Twitter And Facebook Posts Buh-bye, competition.",
        "Floyd Mayweather Has A Cowardly Response To Ronda Rousey's Domestic Violence Dig Are we really that surprised, though?",
        "Dutch, Australian Climbers Die After Summiting Everest They are the first confirmed deaths on Everest of the year.",
        "Sacking Another Myth: The NFL and Goodell The myth has been repeated by nearly everyone that the owners won't fire Goodell because he has done an outstanding job and brought all NFL teams a tremendous increase in financial value. The truth is quite different, and the only thing overvalued is Goodell himself.",
        "College Football's 5 Unexpected Heisman Trophy Hopefuls You don't want to miss these guys.",
        "The Friskies Cats Hilariously Explain Human Super Bowl Behavior The commercial, which Friskies made with Buzzfeed, is intended to be \"kitten-sized\" for the Super Bowl on Feb. 1.",
        "Injured Sports Star Finds Ingenious Way To Keep Working Out \"Where there's a will, there's a way.\"",
        "World Cup Boosts Iran's Image and Highlights Political Sports Battles The Iranian team's performance so far with its 0:0 draw against Nigeria in its first World Cup match in which it was not defeated in its first tournament game as well as the encounter with Argentina, has spared Mr. Rouhani and his government being blamed for another failure.",
        "Mike Tyson Admits He's 'Been Lying About Being Sober', That He's \u00e2\u0080\u0098On The Verge Of Dying' (VIDEO) \"I haven't drank or took drugs in six days, and for me that's a miracle. I've been lying to everybody else that think I was",
        "Ravens, Colts Matchup: Jacoby Jones vs. Indianapolis Special Teams It should be noted that the Ravens' coverage units have some challenges of their own, what with the Colts having returned",
        "Donald Trump's 2012 Yankees Tweet Proves There Really Is A #TweetForEverything Yes, even for Major League Baseball.",
        "Seattle Star Megan Rapinoe Blasts Soccer's World Body As 'Old, Male And Stale' FIFA \"doesn't care about female players,\" the World Cup winner says.",
        "The Golden Touch of a Chicago Cab Driver I do branding for a living and so I appreciate the confidence Estaifan has in who he is and what he stands for. He uses his life experience to connect with others and make even a short cab ride a memorable experience.",
        "NFL Star Announces His Baby's Death In Devastating Message After Game Marquise Goodwin caught a long touchdown pass in a game hours after his newborn son died.",
        "Darren Sharper Fired By NFL Network Aaron Wilson covers the Ravens for The Baltimore Sun By Aaron Wilson, National Football Post Sharper was previously suspended",
        "It's Not Even NBA Season Yet And Russell Westbrook Is Already Trash-Talking This is what happens when you tell Russell Westbrook to chill out.",
        "12-Year-Old LeBron James Jr.'s New Highlight Reel Is Sick The son also rises.",
        "Week 16 Fantasy Football Focus We projected a down week for Rodgers last week, but he bounces back into the top three this week against a bottom ten pass defense that will be without its best pass rusher this week.",
        "Greg Hardy\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Domestic Violence Record Expunged By Judge It doesn\u00e2\u0080\u0099t erase his violent image, though.",
        "Economists: NCAA's Latest Argument Against Paying Players Is \u00e2\u0080\u0098Nonsense' The NCAA's latest scare tactic appears error-ridden.",
        "Michael Wilbon Apology: ESPN Host Apologizes To Dan Steinberg, Bram Weinstein, DC Sports Fans I am quick to tell people in the sports industry when it is necessary to see the errors of their ways, and it's necessary",
        "Michael Phelps Teaches 7-Month-Old Son Boomer To Swim Underwater The kid handled it like a champ.",
        "This Little Boy Comforting Crying Soccer Fan Should Make All Of France Feel Better This makes everything OK.",
        "Irish Rowers Deserve Gold For Funniest TV Interview At Rio 2016 Brothers Paul and Gary O\u00e2\u0080\u0099Donovan are being hailed as \"Ireland's gift to the world.\"",
        "Charles Oakley Got In A Fight At The Knicks Game After Yelling At James Dolan He was later arrested by the NYPD.",
        "Sean Miller Rant: Arizona Coach Repeats 'He Touched The Ball' After Loss To UCLA (VIDEO) RELATED: The 50 Most Badass College Basketball Teams of All Time To be specific, he yelled, \"He touched the ball.\" He animatedly",
        "Roger Federer Defeats Andy Murray To Reach 10th Wimbledon Final He'll face Novak Djokovic in the final on Sunday.",
        "That Moment The Wi-Fi Freezes As Your Teammate Leads An Olympic Final Aaaargh!!!",
        "These Clips Of Stephen Curry's Third Quarter Wednesday Night Are Unreal How many times have we had to write some version of this headline?",
        "World Cup 2014 Group Stage Review The World Cup group stage passes again with it usual splendor, perennial giants seemingly collapsed, new chosen ones in their place, the stereotypical upsets, referee gaffes, miscellaneous action, and repeated history.",
        "Lamar Odom Has Taken Significant Strides Forward In Recent Days, Sources Say Odom's progress apparently shocked his medical team this week.",
        "Some Little Kid Decimated DeMarcus Cousins 8-2 In A Game Of One-On-One WE COUNT GOALTENDS HERE, MR. COUSINS.",
        "Fan, Usher Have Dance-Off During Pistons-Knicks Game (VIDEO) Competition was fierce at the Palace of Auburn Hills earlier this week when the New York Knicks faced the Detroit Pistons",
        "A Running Tally Of How Athletes Are Scoring The Drake-Meek Mill Beef The final count is in and it doesn't look good for Meek.",
        "Chloe Kim\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Dad Celebrates The \u00e2\u0080\u0098American Dream\u00e2\u0080\u0099 After 17-Year-Old\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Gold Medal Win Kim Jong-jin quit his job a decade ago to support his daughter\u00e2\u0080\u0099s budding snowboarding career.",
        "Tennis Player Gabriella Taylor Possibly Poisoned At Wimbledon \"We feel this could not have been an accident,\" her mother says as police investigate.",
        "NFL Says Anti-LGBTQ Bill Could Cost Texas Future Super Bowls The proposed legislation is similar to the North Carolina law that led the NBA, NCAA and ACC to move events out of the state.",
        "Puerto Rico Loses It As Monica Puig Wins Island's First-Ever Olympic Gold \"I think I united a nation,\" the Olympian said.",
        "Peyton Manning Made The Perfect Face Right Before He Got Sacked Perhaps the best Manning Face ever.",
        "San Francisco 49ers Player Makes Incredible 'Buttception' Sadly, things ended on a bum note, as K'Waun Williams was called for pass interference for his cheeky play.",
        "Pita Taufatofua Goes Shirtless One Last Time For Closing Ceremony The Tongan flag bearer and cross-country skier stole the show once more.",
        "A.J. Green Touchdown: Bengals Star Makes Amazing One-Handed Catch Against Chiefs (GIF) The Kansas City Chiefs can look at the game film all the want this week. But they may never be able to figure out what more",
        "Missouri Football Coach Backs Away From Student Activists \"This was strictly about me supporting my players and nothing else,\" Mizzou coach Gary Pinkel said.",
        "Tom Brady Beats NFL In Deflategate Case, Suspension Nullified Brady has been vindicated -- for now.",
        "NBA Star Gives Cell Number Out To The World, Tells Critics To Call Him Direct \"My phone\u00e2\u0080\u0099s in my back pocket right now.\"",
        "Roy Williams Marshall Henderson And Florida Gulf Coast Take Center Stage On NCAA Tournament Sunday 6) Beware of the Stretch Four Mr. Henderson may have gone a mere 6-21 against Wisconsin, but he still managed to dazzle us",
        "We Saw Ben Simmons In Person And Yes, He\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Worth Tanking For 76ers and Lakers fans should be watching all of his games.",
        "MLB Players Yordano Ventura, Andy Marte Die In Separate Car Crashes Both men were reportedly in the Dominican Republic when they were killed Sunday.",
        "The Norwegian Curling Team Should Win Gold For Their Pants Pantastic!",
        "It\u00e2\u0080\u0099s Official: Los Angeles Once Again Has An NFL Team The St. Louis Rams can move for the 2016 season.",
        "Shark Eats Shark: Picture Captures Fisherman's Amazing Catch Near Kaiteriteri, New Zealand (PHOTO) If you're wondering why the sharks' eyes are white, many sharks have a membrane that protects their eyes when they go in",
        "Sochi Closing Ceremony LIVE UPDATES: Russia Celebrates End Of 2014 Winter Olympics While there is no formal, lengthy \"Parade Of Nations\" as is traditional during the opening ceremony, each nation will be",
        "Pete Carroll Got Totally Wiped Out By A Ref On The Sideline Ouch.",
        "Nick Symmonds Says USA Track & Field Exploits Patriotism For Profit \"This is not a hobby for me. This is a career.\"",
        "Tom Brady Throws Samsung Under The Bus In Latest 'Deflategate' Defense Thanks for nothing, Tom Brady!",
        "We\u00e2\u0080\u0099ve All Been This Adorable Crying Dayton Fan With A Cute Little Hat In other words, we feel you, kiddo.",
        "4-time Champ Lance Mackey Joins Impressive Yukon Quest International Sled Dog Race Field Mackey is four-time champion of both the Yukon Quest and the Iditarod Trail Sled Dog Race. He is the only musher to have won both races in the same year, with dual wins in both 2007 and 2008.",
        "Several Eagles Players Already Planning To Skip White House\u00c2\u00a0Visit At least three players say they won't go, if invited.",
        "Jessica Mendoza Joins ESPN's 'Sunday Night Baseball' Full-Time Mendoza keeps making history!",
        "The NHL Should Not Make Definitive Statements About Their Rape Investigations \"The NHL has concluded that the allegations made against Kane were unfounded.\"",
        "LeBron James Once Gained 7 Pounds In A Single NBA Playoff Game Teammates who reportedly saw the scale confirmed the story.",
        "Alabama Prepared For Johnny Manziel In Texas A&M Showdown Of course, stopping Manziel is easier said than done. But Saban and his staff will have had an entire offseason to devise",
        "Floyd Mayweather Jr. vs. Miguel Cotto: LIVE UPDATES On WBA Super Welterweight Fight Will Mayweather remain unbeaten? Do the fighters' weights and ages actually favor Cotto? Can he shock the world and every",
        "Football Fans Are Ready To Give Ray Rice Another Chance. Domestic Violence Experts Are Not. \"I\u00e2\u0080\u0099m just not convinced that what we have is a healthy person.\u00e2\u0080\u009d",
        "NFL Fines William Gay For Domestic Violence Awareness Cleats He's got a solution to the NFL's uniform problem, though.",
        "Paul Allen Looked Petrified During Steph Curry's Absurd Overtime Can someone check on Paul?",
        "Hometown Hero Larry Holmes Steps Out From Muhammad Ali's Shadow Underrated but quietly one of the greatest.",
        "Mark Sanchez Pick Six: Bryan Scott Returns Interception For Touchdown In Jets-Bills (GIF) For those who prefer their Jets fails as GIFs, here you go: On the Jets' second possession of the game -- the first resulted",
        "A New Way Of Playing Professional Basketball: Streetball In my experiences around athletes throughout my life, many of them don't have a plan once their sport ends. They spend their entire lives training and practicing, but once college or their professional careers are over with, they're unsure of what path to take next. Demetrius Spencer, the CEO of Ball Up, wanted to do something about that.",
        "NHL Teams Honor Victims Of Canada's Junior Hockey Bus Crash Teams in Canada and the United States came together as one to pay their respects to the young lives lost.",
        "After Honoring Eric Garner, LeBron's Voice Could Have Been Louder After the game James was asked his reason for wearing the \"I Can't Breathe\" T-shirt, and he responded, \"It was a message to the family. That I'm sorry for their loss, sorry to his wife. That's what it's about.\" It appears that James was more interested in playing it safe, unwilling to ruffle the feathers of his corporate sponsors and brands."
    ]
}